New York, session 2025-2026, A7962.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law, as amended by section 3 of part Y of chapter 3 59 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 4. Except as otherwise provided by this article, the commission shall 5 have the authority to regulate sports pools and the conduct of sports 6 wagering under this article to the same extent that the commission regu- 7 lates other gaming. No casino or mobile sports wagering licensee shall 8 be authorized to operate a sports pool unless it has produced informa- 9 tion, documentation, and assurances concerning its financial background 10 and resources, including cash reserves, that are sufficient to demon- 11 strate that it has the financial stability, integrity, and responsibil- 12 ity to operate a sports pool. In developing rules and regulations appli- 13 cable to sports wagering, the commission shall examine the regulations 14 implemented in other states where sports wagering is conducted and 15 shall, as far as practicable, adopt a similar regulatory framework. The 16 commission shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the 17 provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, regulations 18 governing the: 19 (a) amount of cash reserves to be maintained by casinos and mobile 20 sports wagering licensees to cover winning wagers; 21 (b) acceptance of wagers on a series of sports events; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11562-03-5 A. 7962--A 2 1 (c) maximum wagers which may be accepted by a casino or mobile sports 2 wagering licensee from any one patron [on any one sports event] which 3 shall not exceed the sum of five thousand dollars during a twenty-four 4 hour period; 5 (d) type of wagering tickets which may be used; 6 (e) method of issuing tickets; 7 (f) method of accounting to be used by casinos and mobile sports 8 wagering licensees; 9 (g) types of records which shall be kept; 10 (h) use of [credit and] checks by authorized sports bettors; 11 (i) the process by which a casino may place a layoff bet; 12 (j) the use of global risk management; 13 (k) type of system for wagering; [and] 14 (l) protections for a person placing a wager; and 15 (m) prohibition on certain advertisement practices including odds 16 boosts or similar offers, including advertising that contains the phras- 17 es "bonus", "no sweat", "bonus bet", or any other similar term. 18 § 2. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel 19 wagering and breeding law, as added by section 4 of part Y of chapter 59 20 of the laws of 2021, are amended to read as follows: 21 4. (a) As a condition of licensure, each mobile sports wagering opera- 22 tor shall implement the following measures: 23 (i) limit each authorized sports bettor to one active account on their 24 platform, and prevent anyone they know, or should have known to be a 25 prohibited sports bettor from maintaining accounts or participating in 26 any sports wagering offered by such mobile sports wagering operator; 27 (ii) adopt appropriate safeguards to ensure, to a reasonable degree of 28 certainty, as defined by rules and regulations promulgated by the 29 commission, that authorized sports bettors are physically located within 30 the state when engaging in mobile sports wagering; 31 (iii) prohibit minors from participating in any sports wagering pursu- 32 ant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; 33 (iv) when referencing the chances or likelihood of winning in adver- 34 tisements or upon placement of a sports wager, make clear and conspicu- 35 ous statements that are not inaccurate or misleading concerning the 36 chances of winning and the number of winners; 37 (v) permit any authorized sports bettor to permanently close an 38 account registered to such bettor, on any and all platforms supported by 39 such mobile sports wagering operator, at any time and for any reason; 40 (vi) offer introductory procedures for authorized sports bettors, that 41 shall be prominently displayed on the main page of such mobile sports 42 wagering operator platform, that explain sports wagering; 43 (vii) implement measures to protect the privacy and online security of 44 authorized sports bettors and their accounts; 45 (viii) offer all authorized sports bettors access to [his or her] such 46 bettor's account history and account details; 47 (ix) ensure authorized sports bettors' funds are protected upon depos- 48 it and segregated from the operating funds of such mobile sports wager- 49 ing operator and otherwise protected from corporate insolvency, finan- 50 cial risk, or criminal or civil actions against such mobile sports 51 wagering operator; 52 (x) list on each website, in a prominent place, information concerning 53 assistance for compulsive play in New York state, including a toll-free 54 number directing callers to reputable resources containing further 55 information, which shall be free of charge; A. 7962--A 3 1 (xi) ensure no sports wagering shall be based on a prohibited sports 2 event; 3 (xii) permit account holders to establish self-exclusion gaming limits 4 on a daily, weekly, and monthly basis that enable the account holder to 5 identify the maximum amount of money an account holder may deposit 6 during such period of time; 7 (xiii) when an account holder's lifetime deposits exceed two thousand 8 five hundred dollars, the mobile sports wagering operator shall prevent 9 any wagering until the patron immediately acknowledges that the account 10 holder has met the deposit threshold and may elect to establish respon- 11 sible gaming limits or close the account, and the account holder has 12 received disclosures from the mobile sports wagering operator concerning 13 problem gambling resources. Once a patron has reached their lifetime 14 deposit, such patron shall annually make the acknowledgement required by 15 this paragraph; 16 (xiv) maintain a publicly accessible internet page dedicated to 17 responsible play, a link to which must appear on the mobile sports 18 wagering operator's website and in any mobile application or electronic 19 platform on which a bettor may place wagers. The responsible play page 20 shall include: a statement of the mobile sports wagering operator's 21 policy and commitment to responsible gaming; information regarding, or 22 links to information regarding, the risks associated with gambling and 23 the potential signs of problem gaming; the availability of self-imposed 24 responsible gaming limits; a link to a problem gaming webpage maintained 25 by the office of addiction services and supports; and such other infor- 26 mation or statements as the commission may require by rule; [and] 27 (xv) prohibit authorized sports bettors from placing more than five 28 deposits in such bettor's account during a twenty-four hour period; 29 (xvi) prohibit authorized sports bettors from wagering more than five 30 thousand dollars in a twenty-four hour period; 31 (xvii) prohibit authorized sports bettors from placing proposition 32 bets, defined as a wager on a specific event or statistical outcome 33 within a game that does not directly depend on the game's final score 34 or result; and 35 (xviii) submit annually a problem gaming plan that was approved by the 36 commission in consultation with the office of addiction services and 37 supports that includes: the objectives of and timetables for implement- 38 ing the plan; identification of the persons responsible for implementing 39 and maintaining the plan; procedures for identifying users with 40 suspected or known problem gaming behavior; procedures for providing 41 information to users concerning problem gaming identification and 42 resources; procedures to prevent gaming by minors and self-excluded 43 persons; and such other problem gaming information as the commission may 44 require by rule. 45 (b) No entity shall directly or indirectly operate an unlicensed 46 sports wagering platform in the state of New York, or advertise or 47 promote such unlicensed platform to persons located in the state of New 48 York. 49 (c) Mobile sports wagering licensees shall not offer any sports wager- 50 ing based on any prohibited sports event. 51 (d) Mobile sports wagering licensees shall not permit sports wagering 52 by anyone they know, or should have known, to be a prohibited sports 53 bettor. 54 (e) Advertisements for contests and prizes offered by a mobile sports 55 wagering operator shall [not target prohibited] not: 56 (i) target sports bettors, minors, or self-excluded persons; A. 7962--A 4 1 (ii) include information about odds boosts or similar offers, includ- 2 ing advertising that contains the phrase "bonus", "no sweat", "bonus 3 bet", or any other similar term; 4 (iii) provide information on how to place a sports wager or how sports 5 wagers work; 6 (iv) occur between the hours of eight a.m. and ten p.m. local time; 7 and 8 (v) occur during live sports events. 9 (f) Mobile sports wagering operators shall develop and prominently 10 display procedures on the main page of such mobile sports wagering oper- 11 ator's platform for the filing of a complaint by an authorized sports 12 bettor against such mobile sports wagering operator. An initial response 13 shall be given by such mobile sports wagering operator to such bettor 14 filing the complaint within forty-eight hours. A complete response shall 15 be given by such mobile sports wagering operator to such bettor filing 16 the complaint within ten business days. An authorized sports bettor may 17 file a complaint alleging a violation of the provisions of this article 18 with the commission. 19 (g) Mobile sports wagering licensees shall maintain records of all 20 accounts belonging to authorized sports bettors and retain such records 21 of all transactions in such accounts for the preceding five years; 22 provided however that such records belonging to an authorized sports 23 bettor shall be readily accessible and downloadable, without cost, by 24 such authorized sports bettor. 25 (h) The server or other equipment which is used by a mobile sports 26 wagering licensee to accept mobile sports wagering shall be physically 27 located in the licensed gaming facility and be limited to sports wager- 28 ing related activities in accordance with regulations promulgated by the 29 commission. 30 (i) All mobile sports wagering initiated in this state shall be deemed 31 to take place at the licensed gaming facility where the server or other 32 equipment used by a mobile sports wagering licensee to accept mobile 33 sports wagering is located, regardless of the authorized sports bettor's 34 physical location within this state. 35 (j) All mobile sports wagering shall be conducted in compliance with 36 this section and section thirteen hundred sixty-seven of this title. 37 5. (a) Subject to regulations promulgated by the commission, a mobile 38 sports wagering operator may allow for authorized bettors to sign up to 39 create and fund accounts on its mobile sports wagering platform. 40 (b) Authorized sports bettors may deposit and withdraw funds to and 41 from their account on a mobile sports wagering operator through elec- 42 tronically recognized payment methods, including but not limited to 43 [credit cards and] debit cards[,] or via any other means approved by the 44 commission[; provided however, that in the case of credit card payments, 45 each authorized sports bettor's account per operator shall be limited to 46 a credit card spending amount of two thousand five hundred dollars per 47 year; and provided further, that this limitation shall not apply to 48 other payment methods or to debit cards. No operator shall be authorized 49 to provide a line of credit to any authorized sports bettor]. 50 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.